Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 3. Fireguards; Fences; Injuries to Stock

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Railroad on whose property an accidental fire by sparks from locomotive originates as liable for damages from spread thereof, 18 ALR2d 1081.

Construction and effect, as applied to damage by fire, of liability exemption clause in spur track agreement, 20 ALR2d 711.

Liability for spread of fire purposely and lawfully kindled by independent contractor on railroad right-of-way, 24 ALR2d 241.

§ 37-9-301.
Fireguards.

It shall be the duty of every railroad corporation operating its line of road, or any part of it, within this state, upon its right-of-way upon each side of its roadbed, to maintain annually an effective fireguard upon order of and satisfactory to specifications set forth by the department of transportation so as to prevent fire from spreading to lands adjacent to the right-of-way. The fireguards need not be maintained within the limits of any city or town, nor along that portion of the line of a railroad where the desert or mountainous character of the adjoining land would render such burning impractical or unnecessary.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 50, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1947; Laws 1890-91, ch. 34, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3210; C.S. 1910, § 4203; C.S. 1920, § 5375; R.S. 1931, § 96-111; C.S. 1945, § 65-401; W.S. 1957, § 37-206; Laws 1965, ch. 126, § 1; 1973, ch. 135, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2001, ch. 200, § 2.

Allowing combustibles to grow is not negligence per se. —

It is not per se negligence for a railway company to permit combustible material, such as stalks, grass, grain, or stubble, to grow or remain on its right-of-way in considerable quantities. Union Pac. R.R. v. Gilland, 4 Wyo. 395, 34 P. 953,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1893).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of property owner for damages from spread of accidental fire originating on property, 17 ALR5th 547.

§ 37-9-302.
Fireguards; penalty.

Any railroad corporation failing to comply with the provisions of W.S.

37-9-301

shall be liable to pay a penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each and every mile, or fractional mile, of any strips of land it neglects to treat as directed by the department of transportation upon either side of the line of its road in this state, in each and every year as stated, the penalty to be collected in any proper action in any court of competent jurisdiction, in the name of the state of Wyoming, and when collected it shall be paid into the school fund of the county where the cause of action accrued. The action shall be brought within one (1) year after the violation of W.S.

37-9-301

occurs.

The penalty imposed under subsection (a) of this section applies to any railroad corporation failing to comply with W.S.

37-9-311

.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 50, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1948; Laws 1890-91, ch. 34, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3211; C.S. 1910, § 4204; C.S. 1920, § 5376; R.S. 1931, § 96-112; C.S. 1945, § 65-402; W.S. 1957, § 37-207; Laws 1973, ch. 135, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2001, ch. 200, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 1.

Testimony. —

In action against railroad company for damages caused by failure to use reasonable precaution to prevent spread of fire on right-of-way, witness for plaintiff may testify that from appearance of right-of-way in vicinity of the fire he did not think that it had been burned over by company so as to prevent spread of fire, and also as to what kind of fireguard was placed by the company. Union Pac. R.R. v. Gilland, 4 Wyo. 395, 34 P. 953,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1893).

§ 37-9-303.
Fireguards; liability for damages.

Every railroad corporation operating its line of road, or any part of it, within this state, shall be liable for all damages by fire resulting from or caused by operating any such line of road together with suppression costs, established by the department of transportation, and any damages and costs in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Any damage and suppression cost may be recovered by the party damaged if an action is brought by the party injured within one (1) year next after said damages shall have been inflicted or caused. An injured party who recovers more than has been last offered in writing by the railroad under this section may be awarded reasonable attorney fees and other costs incurred in seeking recovery under this section if it is determined that the railroad acted unreasonably and without cause.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 50, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1949; Laws 1890-91, ch. 34, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 3212; C.S. 1910, § 4205; C.S. 1920, § 5377; R.S. 1931, § 96-113; C.S. 1945, § 65-403; W.S. 1957, § 37-208; Laws 1973, ch. 135, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1997, ch. 70, § 1.

Relation to governments. —

Fact that
the Wyoming Legislature has enacted statutes allowing recovery of
fire suppression costs for fires caused by railroads, by expressio
unius est exclusio alterius, indicates that it normally expects the
governmental entities to cover their expenses through taxes and fees. State v. Black Hills Power, Inc., 2015 WY 99, 354 P.3d 83,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2015).

Testimony. —

In an action against railroad company for injuries by fire spreading from right-of-way, plaintiff may testify, after stating what he observed as to the course of the fire, and on examining the ground burned over the next day, that as result of such observation he concluded fire started on defendant's right-of-way. Union Pac. R.R. v. Gilland, 4 Wyo. 395, 34 P. 953,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1893).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Res ipsa loquitur as to cause of or liability for real-property fires, 21 ALR4th 929.

§ 37-9-304.
Fences and cattle guards; generally.

All railway corporations, owning or operating a line of railway within the state, shall construct, maintain and keep in repair on each side of the track thereof, a sufficient fence which meets or exceeds department of transportation fencing standards, so connected with suitable cattle guards at all public road crossings as to prevent stock from getting on the railroad track of the corporation. The fence shall be constructed within nine (9) months after the completion of any railroad track or any part thereof; provided, that railway corporations shall not be required to construct and maintain a fence within the boundaries of any incorporated city or town.

Any corporation failing to comply with this section is subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for each day during which a violation continues. Each county in which there is a failure to comply with this section shall constitute a separate violation. This penalty shall be prosecuted and collected pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

37-9-302

.

No fine shall be assessed under subsection (b) of this section against a corporation that has on file with the department of transportation an approved plan for fence construction, reconstruction and maintenance so long as the corporation is in full compliance with the terms and conditions of the approved plan.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 84, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 2593; C.S. 1920, § 3086; R.S. 1931, § 96-116; C.S. 1945, § 65-404; W.S. 1957, § 37-209; Laws 2001, ch. 200, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for neglect to close gates, see §

6-9-202

.

As to fences and cattle guards generally, see §§

11-28-101

through

11-28-108

.

Duty in absence of statute. —

In absence of statute requiring it, failure of railroad company to fence its right-of-way is not negligence per se so as to render it liable on ground of such failure alone for the killing of livestock straying upon its tracks. Martin v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 15 Wyo. 493, 89 P. 1025,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1907).

Station grounds. —

Statute is not intended nor to be construed as requiring the fencing of station grounds outside of incorporated cities and towns, where public convenience requires the same to remain open. Miller v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 18 Wyo. 209, 105 P. 908,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1910).

Lookout not required. —

An engineer and trainmen are not required to keep a lookout for trespassing cattle. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R. v. Cash, 24 Wyo. 316, 157 P. 701,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1916).

Cattle in station yard. —

Under this section, cattle struck within yard limits of a station within city limits were trespassers, though not to extent that action would lie in favor of the railroad against the owner. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R. v. Cash, 24 Wyo. 316, 157 P. 701,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1916).

Directed verdict. —

Circumstantial testimony that stock was killed on right-of-way did not create conflict with direct testimony that cattle were on crossing, and verdict should have been directed for railroad. Tisthammer v. Union Pac. R.R., 41 Wyo. 382, 286 P. 377,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1930).

Jury verdict. —

Verdict of jury will not be disturbed on appeal based on conflicting evidence that cattle killed did not enter right-of-way through a gate. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 44 Wyo. 488, 13 P.2d 1081,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1932), modified, 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Contributory negligence. —

Contributory negligence of owner of cattle that were killed, in not notifying railroad that fence was down, did not bar his action, as foreman of the section was presumed to have knowledge of the fence. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 44 Wyo. 488, 13 P.2d 1081,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1932), modified, 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Open private gate. —

Fact that cattle entered right-of-way through a gate without cattle guards at a private crossing was no defense in relieving the railroad from negligence. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 44 Wyo. 488, 13 P.2d 1081,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1932), modified, 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Section is constitutional. —

Conceding the injury hazard to livestock is as great or even greater upon public highways than it is upon railroad private rights-of-way, and that the nature of the peril to livestock is identical on both ways, if there is a material and sufficient area of difference between the ownership and control of the ways used, and if there is a difference in the exclusive character of the use by the railroads of their own rights-of-way as measured against the use of the public highways by motor carriers in common with various other types of vehicular use, then the basis for separate classification would seem to exist and the legislature may impose duties and liabilities upon one class, and fail to impose corresponding duties and liabilities upon the other class, without being in violation of constitutional preclusions of discrimination, inequality, or absence of due process. Chicago & N. W. R.R. v. Bishop, 390 P.2d 731,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1964).

Cited

in

Wyoming & N.W. Ry. v. Snavely, 23 Wyo. 324, 150 P. 760,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1915).

§ 37-9-305.
Fences and cattle guards; liability for damages.

Any corporation operating a railway and failing to fence the same and to construct and maintain suitable cattle guards as required by W.S.

37-9-304

, shall be liable to the owner or owners of any livestock killed or injured by reason of its failure to construct or keep in repair the fence or cattle guard in the manner provided in W.S.

37-9-304

, for the full amount of the damage sustained by the owner on account thereof and to make a prima facie case for recovery, it shall only be necessary for the owner to prove the loss or injury to his property; provided, that no corporation operating a railroad shall be liable for any damage occasioned by the willful act of the owner or of his agent or employees or for stock killed or injured on public road crossings unless negligence on the part of the corporation, its agents, servants or employees can be shown.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 84, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 2594; C.S. 1920, § 3087; R.S. 1931, § 96-117; C.S. 1945, § 65-405; W.S. 1957, § 37-210; Laws 2001, ch. 200, § 2.

Law governing recovery. —

The legislature intended this section to be the rule for the recovery for stock killed or injured on railroads, at least where they were required to construct and maintain fences and cattle guards, and in other cases mentioned. Wyoming & N. W. R.R. v. Snavely, 23 Wyo. 324, 150 P. 760,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1915).

Ordinary care. —

Under this section, where trainmen had no reason to expect that cattle were in any special danger or that they were trespassers, railroad would be held to ordinary care in operation after their discovery on track in a station yard. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R. v. Cash, 24 Wyo. 316, 157 P. 701,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1916).

Duty of trainmen. —

Duty of trainmen to use ordinary care to avoid killing stock does not arise as to trespassing livestock until its perilous condition is discovered. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R. v. Cash, 24 Wyo. 316, 157 P. 701,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1916).

Entry through gate. —

Fact that cattle entered right-of-way through gate without cattle guards at a private crossing was no defense in relieving the railroad from negligence. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 44 Wyo. 488, 13 P.2d 1081,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1932), modified, 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Contributory negligence. —

Contributory negligence of owner of cattle killed, in not notifying railroad that the fence was down, did not bar his action, as section foreman was presumed to have knowledge of the fence. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 44 Wyo. 488, 13 P.2d 1081,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1932), modified, 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Appeal. —

Verdict of jury will not be disturbed on appeal based on the conflicting evidence that the cattle killed did not enter right-of-way through a gate. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 44 Wyo. 488, 13 P.2d 1081,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1932), modified, 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Burden of proof. —

Burden of proving freedom from negligence was on the railroad where it was admitted that cattle were killed by defendant's train. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 44 Wyo. 488, 13 P.2d 1081,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1932), modified, 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Under ordinary care where plaintiff has made a prima facie case the railroad has the burden of proving the kind of crossings involved. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Under this section burden of proof shifted to railroad when injury of cattle by railroad was admitted and it was assumed that ownership and value were shown. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Evidence required. —

Some evidence merely is not sufficient to banish presumption of negligence. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

The prima facie case made under provisions of this section can only be met by evidence of ordinary care on part of the railroad. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Jury question. —

Where cattle were injured by entering railroad's property through private gate which was not protected by cattle guards and plaintiff made a prima facie case independent of this section, the question was for the jury. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Where the evidence as to ordinary care is not uncontradicted, the question is for the jury. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Presumption. —

Where it is shown that ordinary care was used presumption of negligence vanishes and evidence of the railroad must be met by other competent evidence. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Verdict. —

Where evidence of ordinary care is clear, credible and uncontradicted, the verdict must be for the railroad. Hildebrand v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 45 Wyo. 175, 17 P.2d 651,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1933).

Liability is imposed only upon failure to construct or repairfence. —

This section only imposes liability upon a railroad when livestock is injured or killed by reason of the railroad company's failure to construct or keep in repair the required fencing. Chicago & N. W. R.R. v. Bishop, 390 P.2d 731,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1964).

Absolute liability is not imposed. —

The provision in this section that proof of loss or injury to the property is sufficient to make a prima facie case for recovery falls short of imposing any absolute liability, because the prima facie showing may be rebutted. Chicago & N. W. R.R. v. Bishop, 390 P.2d 731,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1964).

Cited

in

Wyoming & N.W. Ry. v. Snavely, 23 Wyo. 324, 150 P. 760,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1915); Tisthammer v. Union P.R.R., 41 Wyo. 382, 286 P. 377,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1930).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Disregarding uncontradicted testimony of defendant's employees in action for killing stock by railroad train, 62 ALR2d 1191.

§ 37-9-306.
Injury to stock; definitions.

For the purpose of this article the terms “livestock” and “stock” shall include all classes of horses, asses, mules, cattle, sheep, swine, buffalo, beefalo, llamas and other domesticated animals.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 105, art. V, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 4198; R.S. 1899, § 3216; C.S. 1910, § 4208; C.S. 1920, § 5380; R.S. 1931, § 96-118; C.S. 1945, § 65-408; W.S. 1957, § 37-211; Laws 2001, ch. 200, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to damages for injuries to stock for failure of railroads to maintain fence or cattleguards, see §

37-9-305

.

§ 37-9-307.
Injury to stock; notice to owner; procedure if owner unknown.

Any railroad corporation injuring or killing any livestock, by running any engine, car or cars, over or against the livestock, shall immediately notify the owner or owners, a brand inspector or the department of transportation, giving a full description, including the number, classes and brands, of the livestock, naming the locality where the stock was killed or injured. It shall be the responsibility of the corporation to retrieve the animal injured or killed after identification and notification, and dispose of the animal within ten (10) days from the date of notification.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 105, art. V, § 2; Laws 1888, ch. 48, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3214; C.S. 1910, § 4206; C.S. 1920, § 5378; R.S. 1931, § 96-114; C.S. 1945, § 65-406; W.S. 1957, § 37-212; Laws 2001, ch. 200, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to removal and inspection of hides of animals killed by railroad companies, see §

11-30-106

.

As to unlawful killing of wild horses, see §

11-30-115

.

Editor's notes. —

The words “Any such corporation … ” at the beginning of a prior version of this section referred to C.L. 1876, ch. 105, art. V, § 1.

C.L. 1876, ch. 105, art. V, § 1, read: “That any corporation operating a railway, or railroad, within this territory [state], which shall injure or kill any livestock, by running any engine or engines, car or cars, over or against any such livestock, shall be liable to the owner or owners of such livestock, for the damage sustained by such owner or owners, by reason of such injuring or killing of such livestock.”

That section was declared to be unconstitutional in Schenck v. Union Pac. Ry., 5 Wyo. 430, 40 P. 840,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1895).

Double liability. —

This section as enacted contained a provision providing for double liability on failure to comply with the provisions of this section. This provision, if valid, was superseded by §

37-9-305

.Wyoming & N. W. R.R. v. Snavely, 23 Wyo. 324, 150 P. 760,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1915).

§ 37-9-308.
Injury to stock; owner to make sworn statement of value.

Any person owning any livestock which is killed or injured, in the manner set forth in W.S.

37-9-307

, shall within thirty (30) days after the person is notified of the killing or injuring, as provided in W.S.

37-9-307

, furnish the corporation having killed or injured the livestock, through its nearest agent, sworn evidence of the value of the livestock. The corporation shall then report to the department of transportation within thirty (30) days, receipt of the sworn evidence of the value of the livestock killed or injured.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 105, art. V, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 4197; Laws 1888, ch. 48, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3215; C.S. 1910, § 4207; C.S. 1920, § 5379; R.S. 1931, § 96-115; C.S. 1945, § 65-407; W.S. 1957, § 37-213; Laws 2001, ch. 200, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

The words “in the manner set forth in the first section of this act” in a prior version of this section referred to C.L. 1876, ch. 105, art. V, § 1. See Editor's note to §

37-9-307

.

Cited

in

Wyoming & N.W. Ry. v. Snavely, 23 Wyo. 324, 150 P. 760,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1915).

§ 37-9-309.
Payment of claims; time; interest; costs.

Any railroad corporation liable for the payment of claims for damages from fire and livestock killed or injured shall either pay or reject the claim within sixty (60) days after notice and evidence of the claim is furnished by the claimant. All claims shall include information necessary for the railroad to verify property damage, value of property damages, and propriety of claim with all supporting bills, when available. Claims shall not be deemed filed until the information has been received by the railroad. A claim which is not rejected or paid within sixty (60) days shall be deemed granted and shall constitute a lien upon the property of the railroad. Claims which are unpaid after sixty (60) days shall draw interest at the rate of eighteen percent (18%) per annum until paid, whether voluntarily or by court judgment and order.

With respect to any property damage caused by a railroad, the court shall order the railroad corporation to pay the reasonable attorney fees and court costs incurred by a property owner if the court finds that the railroad corporation did not negotiate in good faith to establish the reasonable value of damages caused to the property owner by the railroad, or if the property owner was required to initiate legal proceedings against the railroad corporation to enforce a judgment for damages.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 192, § 1; 1997, ch. 70, § 1; 1999, ch. 66, § 1.

§ 37-9-310.
Authority of department of transportation to adopt rules and regulations; information to be provided.

The department of transportation shall adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act prescribing standards for fireguards, fences and cattle guards erected and maintained by railroad corporations. The department of transportation shall provide private property owners with information on where to file a claim in the case of damage to private property caused by railroads.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 116, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 37-9-311.
Spraying weeds on rights-of-way.

It shall further be the duty of the railroad to spray noxious weeds on rights-of-way to prevent spread to adjoining lands.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 126, § 2; 2001, ch. 200, § 3.

Cross references. —

For provisions of the Wyoming Weed and Pest Control Act of 1973, see §

11-5-101

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001 ch. 200, § 1, also enacted a §

37-9-311

. That section has been redesignated as §

37-9-312

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

§ 37-9-312.
Immediate or urgent fence repairs.

After notification to the railroad and the department of transportation by the landowner concerning any damaged fence or a fence in disrepair, the landowner shall have the right to be reimbursed by the railroad for the reasonable and customary costs for such repairs, provided:

The landowner gives the railroad specific information concerning the location of the damage;

Following the notice by the landowner, the railroad fails to commit that it will make the repairs within three (3) business days of the initial notice by the landowner or fails to complete the repairs within five (5) business days or within a mutually agreed upon time from the date of the initial notice by the landowner; and

The need for repair is of an immediate or urgent nature as determined by the landowner and the department of transportation.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as a prohibition against a railroad immediately repairing the fence, the adjacent landowner and the railroad mutually agreeing to other terms for such repairs, or to an adjacent landowner making such repairs at his own expense.

Repairs made by a landowner pursuant to this section shall not be deemed to create any continuing duty or any landowner liability.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 200, § 1; 2011, ch. 159, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(ii), added “or within a mutually agreed upon time from the date”; and added (c).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001 ch. 200, § 1, enacted this section as §

37-9-311

.Laws 2001, ch. 200, § 3, renumbered former §

37-9-202

as §

37-9-311

. The section enacted by ch. 200, § 1, has been redesignated as §

37-9-312

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.